Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1731.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Consumer Debt Collection Fairness Act.Section 2. Legislative findings.The General Assembly finds that:(1) Many debt collection lawsuits are filed without sufficient documentation of the underlying debt, resulting in default judgments against consumers who may not owe the debt.(2) Pennsylvania consumers deserve clear notice and fair opportunity to contest debts alleged in court.(3) Stronger protections, modeled after those in the State of New York, are necessary to prevent abusive debt collection practices and ensure integrity in court <--12345678910111213141516 proceedings.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Consumer debt." Any obligation or alleged obligation of a natural person to pay money arising out of a transaction in which the money, property or services are primarily for personal, family or household purposes."Debt buyer." A person or entity that is regularly engaged in the business of purchasing charged-off consumer debt for collection purposes.Section 4. Required documentation for collection actions.A debt collector or debt buyer may not commence a legal action to collect a consumer debt unless the complaint includes:(1) The name of the original creditor and the last four digits of the original account number.(2) An itemization of the amount owed, including:(i) Charge-off balance.(ii) Post-charge-off interest or fees.(iii) Payments or credits applied.(3) Proof of ownership of the debt, including a chain of title if the debt has been sold.(4) A copy of the original contract or charge-off statement demonstrating the consumer's liability.Section 5. Statute of limitations.Any legal action to collect a consumer debt must be commenced within three years of the date of the last payment or charge by the consumer.Section 6. Prohibition of default judgments without proof.20250HB1731PN3637 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 No court may enter a default judgment in a consumer debt action unless the plaintiff files:(1) An affidavit of facts based on personal knowledge.(2) All required documentation under section 4.(3) Proof that the consumer was properly served and notified of the consumer's rights.Section 7. Notice to consumer.Each consumer debt lawsuit must include a separate "Notice of Consumer Rights" stating:(1) The consumer's right to dispute the debt.(2) The right to request documentation.(3) Where to seek legal help or assistance.Section 8. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 90 days.AMENDING TITLE 12 (COMMERCE AND TRADE) OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES, IN CONSUMER CREDIT, PROVIDING FOR CONSUMER DEBT COLLECTION FAIRNESS.THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA HEREBY ENACTS AS FOLLOWS:SECTION 1. TITLE 12 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES IS AMENDED BY ADDING A CHAPTER TO READ:CHAPTER 65CONSUMER DEBT COLLECTION FAIRNESSSEC.6501. SCOPE OF CHAPTER.6502. FINDINGS AND DECLARATIONS.6503. DEFINITIONS.6504. REQUIRED DOCUMENTATION FOR COLLECTION ACTIONS.6505. STATUTE OF LIMITATIONS.6506. PROHIBITION OF DEFAULT JUDGMENTS WITHOUT PROOF.6507. NOTICE TO CONSUMER.20250HB1731PN3637 - 3 - <--12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728293031 § 6501. SCOPE OF CHAPTER.THIS CHAPTER PROVIDES FOR CONSUMER DEBT COLLECTION FAIRNESS.§ 6502. FINDINGS AND DECLARATIONS.THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS THAT:(1) MANY DEBT COLLECTION LAWSUITS ARE FILED WITHOUT SUFFICIENT DOCUMENTATION OF THE UNDERLYING DEBT, RESULTING IN DEFAULT JUDGMENTS AGAINST CONSUMERS WHO MAY NOT OWE THE DEBT.(2) PENNSYLVANIA CONSUMERS DESERVE CLEAR NOTICE AND FAIR OPPORTUNITY TO CONTEST DEBTS ALLEGED IN COURT.(3) STRONGER PROTECTIONS, MODELED AFTER THOSE IN THE STATE OF NEW YORK, ARE NECESSARY TO PREVENT ABUSIVE DEBT COLLECTION PRACTICES AND ENSURE INTEGRITY IN COURT PROCEEDINGS.§ 6503. DEFINITIONS.THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES WHEN USED IN THIS CHAPTER SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:"CONSUMER DEBT." ANY OBLIGATION OR ALLEGED OBLIGATION OF A NATURAL PERSON TO PAY MONEY ARISING OUT OF A TRANSACTION IN WHICH THE MONEY, PROPERTY OR SERVICES ARE PRIMARILY FOR PERSONAL, FAMILY OR HOUSEHOLD PURPOSES."DEBT BUYER." A PERSON OR ENTITY THAT IS REGULARLY ENGAGED IN THE BUSINESS OF PURCHASING CHARGED-OFF CONSUMER DEBT FOR COLLECTION PURPOSES.§ 6504. REQUIRED DOCUMENTATION FOR COLLECTION ACTIONS.A DEBT COLLECTOR OR DEBT BUYER MAY NOT COMMENCE A LEGAL ACTION TO COLLECT A CONSUMER DEBT UNLESS THE COMPLAINT INCLUDES:(1) THE NAME OF THE ORIGINAL CREDITOR AND THE LAST FOUR DIGITS OF THE ORIGINAL ACCOUNT NUMBER.(2) AN ITEMIZATION OF THE AMOUNT OWED, INCLUDING:20250HB1731PN3637 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (I) CHARGE-OFF BALANCE.(II) POST-CHARGE-OFF INTEREST OR FEES.(III) PAYMENTS OR CREDITS APPLIED.(3) PROOF OF OWNERSHIP OF THE DEBT, INCLUDING A CHAIN OF TITLE IF THE DEBT HAS BEEN SOLD.(4) A COPY OF THE ORIGINAL CONTRACT OR CHARGE-OFF STATEMENT DEMONSTRATING THE CONSUMER'S LIABILITY.§ 6505. STATUTE OF LIMITATIONS.ANY LEGAL ACTION TO COLLECT A CONSUMER DEBT MUST BE COMMENCED WITHIN THREE YEARS OF THE DATE OF THE LAST PAYMENT OR CHARGE BY THE CONSUMER.§ 6506. PROHIBITION OF DEFAULT JUDGMENTS WITHOUT PROOF.NO COURT MAY ENTER A DEFAULT JUDGMENT IN A CONSUMER DEBT ACTION UNLESS THE PLAINTIFF FILES:(1) AN AFFIDAVIT OF FACTS BASED ON PERSONAL KNOWLEDGE. (2) ALL REQUIRED DOCUMENTATION UNDER SECTION 6504 (RELATING TO REQUIRED DOCUMENTATION FOR COLLECTION ACTIONS).(3) PROOF THAT THE CONSUMER WAS PROPERLY SERVED AND NOTIFIED OF THE CONSUMER'S RIGHTS.§ 6507. NOTICE TO CONSUMER.EACH CONSUMER DEBT LAWSUIT MUST INCLUDE A SEPARATE "NOTICE OF CONSUMER RIGHTS" STATING:(1) THE CONSUMER'S RIGHT TO DISPUTE THE DEBT.(2) THE RIGHT TO REQUEST DOCUMENTATION.(3) WHERE TO SEEK LEGAL HELP OR ASSISTANCE.SECTION 2. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 90 DAYS.20250HB1731PN3637 - 5 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526